North Carolina, session 2025, HB898.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 105-164.13 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(5r) Sales to an internet service provider or a contractor employed by an internet
service provider of equipment, parts, accessories, and other tangible personal
property used in the business of providing internet service access, regardless
of where such property is located. The term includes (i) tangible personal
property used to transmit, convey, amplify, or route information or data, (ii)
related property and equipment, and (iii) sales of electricity to power, and
sales to apply, install, maintain, operate, and repair, tangible personal property
exempt under this subdivision."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025, and applies to sales made on
or after that date.
*H898-v-1*